Hawaii statutes.
§431:9A-110 Legal, trade, and assumed
names. (a) Every insurance producer doing business in this State shall
notify the commissioner in writing of the insurance producer's legal name and
trade name, if applicable.

(b) An insurance producer doing business under
any name other than the producer's legal name shall notify the commissioner in
writing prior to using the assumed name. [L 2001, c 216, pt of §2; am L 2006, c
154, §29]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next